Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.410

Electronic wills—Definition.

The definition in this section applies throughout RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

"Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to affix to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, an electronic sound, or process.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1002.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.